North Carolina, session 2025, HB266.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 103 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 103-19. Women Veterans Day.
The twelfth day of June of each year is designated as Women Veterans Day in North
Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H266-v-1*